Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 4. Usurpation.

Collateral references. —

65 Am. Jur. 2d, Quo Warranto, § 1 et seq.

67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, §§ 154-160, 194-197.

Sec. 09.50.310.
Action for usurpation of office or franchise.

An action may be brought by the attorney general upon the attorney general’s own information or upon complaint of a private party against (1) a person who usurps, intrudes into, or unlawfully holds or exercises a public office, civil or military, or a franchise, or an office in a corporation, either public or private; (2) a public officer who has acted to forfeit the office; or (3) any number of persons acting as a corporation without being incorporated.

History.

(§ 28.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.320.
Action on information or application of private party.

When the action is brought upon the information or application of a private party, the attorney general may require that party to enter into an undertaking with sureties to be approved by the attorney general, conditioned on that party’s paying a judgment for costs or damages recovered against the plaintiff and costs and expenses incurred in the prosecution of the action.

History.

(§ 28.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.330.
Determination of rights of defendant and claimant.

When the action is brought and the claim is made that another person is rightfully entitled to the office, judgment may be given upon the right of the defendant and also upon the right of the person so claimed to be entitled, or only upon the right of the defendant as justice may require.

History.

(§ 28.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.340.
Judgment for claimant.

If judgment is for the person claiming the franchise or office, that person is entitled to the possession and enjoyment of the franchise, or to assume the execution of the office after qualifying as required by law.

History.

(§ 28.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.350.
Recovery of damages by claimant; civil arrest.

If judgment is for the person claiming the franchise or office, that person may recover the damages that may have been sustained by reason of the usurpation of the office by the defendant.
In the action, the defendant may be provisionally arrested and held to bail in the manner as in actions where the defendant is subject to arrest.

History.

(§ 28.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For provisions related to civil arrest, see AS

09.40.120

— AS

09.40.220

.

Sec. 09.50.360.
Multiple claimants.

When several persons claim to be entitled to the same office or franchise, one action may be brought against all those persons in order to try their respective rights to that office or franchise.

History.

(§ 28.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.370.
Judgment against defendant.

If a defendant is adjudged guilty of usurping or intruding into or unlawfully holding or exercising an office or franchise, judgment shall be given that the defendant be excluded from holding or exercising the office or franchise. The court may also, in its discretion, impose a fine upon the defendant of not more than $2,000.
If a corporation is defendant and a judgment is given that causes the corporation to cease to exist, the corporation shall dissolve.

History.

(§ 28.07 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.380.
Enforcement of judgment for costs.

A judgment given in an action provided for in AS

09.50.310

—

09.50.380

in respect to costs and disbursements may be enforced by execution as a judgment that requires the payment of money.

History.

(§ 28.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)